Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2285HZ (1) 91 th/ns H.F. 971 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 307.50 Scenic byways enhancement 1 fund. 2 1. A scenic byways enhancement fund is created in the 3 state treasury under the control of the department. The fund 4 shall consist of moneys transferred to the fund pursuant 5 to section 321.44B and any other moneys appropriated to or 6 deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to 7 the department for the support, development, maintenance, and 8 enhancement, including but not limited to litter prevention, of 9 the scenic byways of this state. 10 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund 11 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a 12 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 13 expenditure for the purposes designated. Notwithstanding 14 section 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in 15 the fund shall be credited to the fund. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 321.44B Voluntary contribution ââ 17 scenic byways enhancement fund ââ amount retained by county 18 treasurer. 19 For each application for vehicle registration renewal, 20 the county treasurer or the department shall request through 21 use of a written form, and, if the application is made in 22 person, through verbal communication, that an applicant make a 23 voluntary contribution of one dollar or more, computed to the 24 nearest whole dollar, to the scenic byways enhancement fund 25 established in section 307.50. One hundred percent of the 26 moneys collected by the county and one hundred percent of the 27 moneys collected by the department in the form of contributions 28 shall be remitted to the treasurer of state for deposit in the 29 scenic byways enhancement fund to be used for the purposes 30 specified for the fund. However, up to five percent of the 31 moneys collected by the county may be retained by the county 32 treasurer for deposit in the general fund of the county. 33 The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 34 administer this section. 35 -1- LSB 2285HZ (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 971 Sec. 3. Section 331.557, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. Issue, renew, and replace lost or damaged vehicle 3 registration cards or plates and issue and transfer 4 certificates of title for vehicles , and collect voluntary 5 contributions, as provided in sections 321.17 through 321.20B , 6 321.22 through 321.26 , 321.28 through 321.32 , 321.34 , 321.35 , 7 and 321.37 through 321.52 . 8 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 9 2026. 10